Nevada, session 83, AB67.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 226 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Children’s Health Insurance Program” means the
program established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 1397aa to 1397jj,
inclusive, to provide health insurance for uninsured children from
low-income families in this State.
Sec. 4. “Designated beneficiary” means a natural person
born in this State on or after January 1, 2026, whose birth was
-
*AB67*

– 3 –
subject to medical coverage provided under Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program.
Sec. 5. “Medicaid” means the program established pursuant
to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1396 et seq.,
to provide assistance for part or all of the cost of medical care
rendered on behalf of indigent persons.
Sec. 6. “Program” means the Nevada Baby Bonds Program
established by section 8 of this act.
Sec. 7. “Trust Fund” means the Nevada Baby Bonds Trust
Fund created by section 8 of this act.
Sec. 8. 1. The Nevada Baby Bonds Program is hereby
established, to be administered by the State Treasurer.
2. The Nevada Baby Bonds Trust Fund is hereby created for
the purpose of carrying out the Program. The Trust Fund and any
account established by the State Treasurer pursuant to subsection
3 must be administered by the State Treasurer.
3. The State Treasurer may establish such accounts in the
Trust Fund as the State Treasurer determines necessary to carry
out the duties of the State Treasurer pursuant to sections 2 to 14,
inclusive, of this act.
4. The Trust Fund is an instrumentality of this State, and its
property and income are exempt from all taxation of this State and
any political subdivision thereof.
5. The Trust Fund consists of:
(a) All money from public or private sources appropriated by
or made available to this State for the benefit of the Trust Fund;
and
(b) All earnings on the money in the Trust Fund.
6. The money in the Trust Fund:
(a) Is not the property of this State and this State has no claim
to or interest in such money; and
(b) Must not be commingled with any money of this State.
7. Any contract entered into by the State Treasurer on behalf
of the Trust Fund does not constitute a debt or obligation of this
State, and no designated beneficiary is entitled to any money in the
Trust Fund except for that money credited to the designated
beneficiary pursuant to section 9 of this act.
8. The money in the Trust Fund must be preserved, invested
and expended solely pursuant to and for the purposes authorized
by sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act and must not be loaned or
otherwise transferred or used by this State for any other purpose.
9. The Trust Fund must continue in existence as long as it
holds any deposits or has any obligations, or until its existence is
terminated by law. Upon termination, any unclaimed assets must
revert to the State General Fund.
-
*AB67*

– 4 –
10. The State Treasurer may use not more than 5 percent of
the money appropriated during a fiscal year for the Program to
pay administrative costs.
Sec. 9. 1. The Department of Health and Human Services
shall notify the State Treasurer of the birth of each designated
beneficiary. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
State Treasurer shall, within the limits of money made available
for this purpose, credit to each designated beneficiary $3,200 in
the Trust Fund. If the money available for such purpose is
insufficient to cover all designated beneficiaries born for a
particular year, the State Treasurer shall:
(a) Determine the appropriate number of designated
beneficiaries for whom money in the Trust Fund is available; and
(b) Select by lottery the designated beneficiaries for that year
who will receive a credit of $3,200 in the Trust Fund.
2. A designated beneficiary may submit a claim to the State
Treasurer to receive money in the Trust Fund credited to the
designated beneficiary if the designated beneficiary:
(a) Is at least 18 but less than 30 years of age;
(b) Has been a resident of this State for at least the 12 months
immediately preceding the submission of the claim to the State
Treasurer;
(c) Attests that he or she will use the money for one or more of
the following purposes:
(1) Postsecondary education, including, without limitation,
vocational education or apprenticeship readiness and training;
(2) To purchase a home;
(3) To start or purchase a business; or
(4) To invest in financial assets or personal capital that
provides a long-term gain to the wages or wealth of the designated
beneficiary; and
(d) Has successfully completed a course in financial literacy
approved by the State Treasurer, which must include, without
limitation, training on the rights and protections available to
consumers when:
(1) Receiving or repaying a student loan for postsecondary
education;
(2) Purchasing a home;
(3) Starting or purchasing a business; and
(4) Investing in financial assets or personal capital that
provides a long-term gain to the wages or wealth of the designated
beneficiary.
3. The money for which the designated beneficiary may
submit a claim pursuant to subsection 2 must include the:
-
*AB67*

– 5 –
(a) Amount credited to the designated beneficiary pursuant to
subsection 1; and
(b) Pro rata share of the total net earnings from the investment
of the money held in the Trust Fund that the State Treasurer
determines is attributable to the designated beneficiary.
4. The State Treasurer must credit back to the Trust Fund all
money which the designated beneficiary is entitled to claim
pursuant to subsection 3 if the designated beneficiary:
(a) Dies before he or she is eligible to submit a claim to the
State Treasurer pursuant to subsection 2; or
(b) Does not submit a claim that meets the requirements set
forth in subsection 2 before the designated beneficiary reaches 30
years of age.
Sec. 10. 1. The State Treasurer shall provide an annual
statement to each designated beneficiary who receives a credit in
the Trust Fund pursuant to section 9 of this act which must
include, without limitation:
(a) A statement of the amount credited to the designated
beneficiary in the Trust Fund;
(b) A projection of the growth of the amount credited to the
designated beneficiary in the Trust Fund;
(c) Resources and information to promote the financial
wellness and literacy of the designated beneficiary; and
(d) Any other information about the Program that the State
Treasurer determines to be relevant.
2. The State Treasurer may request the contact information
of any designated beneficiary from a state agency for the purpose
of carrying out the provisions of subsection 1. Upon any such
request, a state agency shall provide the State Treasurer with the
contact information of a designated beneficiary.
Sec. 11. Except as otherwise provided by federal law, any
money deposited into the Trust Fund and credited to a designated
beneficiary, and any increase in the values thereof, must not be
used to calculate the personal assets of a designated beneficiary
for purposes of determining the eligibility of the designated
beneficiary for any:
1. Disability, medical or other health benefits administered by
this State; or
2. Student loan program, student grant program or other
student financial aid program administered by this State.
Sec. 12. 1. The State Treasurer, on behalf of the Trust
Fund and for trust purposes, shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, invest and
reinvest the money in the Trust Fund, including, without
limitation, in any instrument, obligation, security or property, in
-
*AB67*

– 6 –
any manner that is reasonable and appropriate in order to achieve
the objectives of the Trust Fund, and while exercising the
discretion and care of a prudent person in similar circumstances
with similar objectives; and
(b) Give due consideration to the expected rate of return, risk,
term or maturity, diversification of the total investments within the
Trust Fund, liquidity, projected disbursements and expenditures
and anticipated deposits, contributions and gifts to the Trust
Fund.
2. The State Treasurer shall not, on behalf of the Trust Fund,
invest directly in obligations of the State or any political
subdivision thereof or in any investment or other fund
administered by the State Treasurer.
3. The State Treasurer, on behalf of the Trust Fund and for
trust purposes, may:
(a) Enter into contracts for the Trust Fund, including, without
limitation, contracts for legal, actuarial, accounting, custodial,
advisory, management, administrative, advertising, marketing and
consulting services, and pay for such contractual services from the
earnings on the money in the Trust Fund;
(b) Procure insurance for the Trust Fund in connection with
the property, assets, activities or deposits of the Trust Fund;
(c) Apply for, accept and expend any gifts, grants and
donations from any public or private source for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this
act; and
(d) Take any other action necessary to carry out the provisions
of sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act, and incidental to the
duties imposed on the State Treasurer pursuant to sections 2 to 14,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, all
information about a designated beneficiary which is contained in
a record or file in the possession, control or custody of the State
Treasurer is confidential regardless of the form, location and
manner of creation or storage of a record or file containing the
information.
2. The State Treasurer may only disclose information made
confidential pursuant to subsection 1 to a third party if:
(a) Such disclosure is necessary for the State Treasurer to
carry out his or her duties related to the Program; and
(b) The State Treasurer executes a confidentiality agreement
with the third party before providing the third party with any
confidential information.
Sec. 14. The State Treasurer may adopt any regulations
necessary for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of
-
*AB67*

– 7 –
sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this act, including, without
limitation, requirements for the course in financial literacy for
designated beneficiaries required pursuant to subsection 2 of
section 9 of this act and requirements to ensure a designated
beneficiary has successfully completed such a course.
Sec. 15. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
-
*AB67*

– 8 –
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
-
*AB67*

– 9 –
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, section 13 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
-
*AB67*

– 10 –
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 16. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada Baby Bonds Trust Fund created by section 8 of
this act the sum of $5,000,000 for the establishment of the Nevada
Baby Bonds Program pursuant to section 8 of this act.
Sec. 17. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 16 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 1 through 15, inclusive, of this act become
effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB67*